Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 610.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise exempted, an appeal to the Circuit Court may be taken as a matter
of right from the juvenile session of the District Court from dispositional orders
under KRS 610.110.
(2) The appeal authorized by this section shall be taken as[in the manner] provided in
the Rules of Criminal Procedure, and the Circuit Court shall, in the best
interests[interest] of the child, hear the appeal[such cases] expeditiously.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:45 AM Jacketed